Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Construction of State Highway System

§ 65-3-201.
Construction of Northern District — Monroe County.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall construct to department design standards and may acquire by gift, purchase or eminent domain proceedings such property as may be necessary to perform construction of the following described segment of highway.

Northern District – Monroe County:

Relocation of U.S. Highway 278 south of its current route to provide for four (4) lanes of traffic beginning at or near its intersection with the eastern city limits of the City of Amory and proceeding to a point at or near its intersection with the western city limits of the City of Amory.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 562, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 65-3-203.
Construction of Northern District — Prentiss County.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall construct to department design standards and may acquire by gift, purchase or eminent domain proceedings such property as may be necessary to perform construction of the following described segment of highway:

Northern District – Prentiss County:

Relocation of Mississippi Highway 30 beginning east of its intersection with Mississippi Highway 4 and Mississippi Highway 364, thence proceed southwesterly to a point on U.S. Highway 45 south of the City of Booneville.

The mileage of highway specifically designated in subsection (1) of this section shall be under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance and, together with the highways designated in Sections 65-3-3 and 65-3-5, and all other laws adding links to the state designated highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 562, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 65-3-205.
Construction of Northern District — Pontotoc, Lee, Monroe, and Itawamba Counties.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall construct to department design standards, may perform such reconstruction as may be required to existing highways and may acquire by gift, purchase or eminent domain proceedings such property as may be necessary to provide four (4) lanes for traffic on and along the following locations:

Northern District – Pontotoc, Lee and Monroe Counties:

Mississippi Highway 6 (Appalachian Corridor V) from Mississippi Highway 9 easterly to U.S. Highway 45 south of Tupelo and continuing easterly to existing Mississippi Highway 6 near Plantersville, a distance of approximately 10.5 miles, and Mississippi Highway 6 from the City of Amory to its intersection with U.S. Highway 45 south of Nettleton, including relocation of Mississippi Highway 6 south of Nettleton, a distance of approximately 10 miles.

Northern District – Itawamba County:

Mississippi Highway 76 (Appalachian Corridor V) from a point approximately 5.0 miles northeast of U.S. Highway 78 near the community of Fairview and extending northeasterly approximately 11 miles to the Alabama state line.

The mileage of highways specifically designated in subsection (1) of this section shall be under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance and, together with the highways designated in Sections 65-3-3 and 65-3-5, and all other laws adding links to the state designated highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 562, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 65-3-207.
Construction of Central District — Bolivar and Sunflower Counties.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall construct and reconstruct to department design standards and may acquire by gift, purchase or eminent domain proceedings such property as may be necessary to provide four (4) lanes for traffic on and along the following location:

Central District – Bolivar and Sunflower Counties:

Mississippi Highway 8 from Cleveland to Ruleville.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 562, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1997.